ru: Степень компрессии: Очень твердый; Твердый; Легкий; Средний; Другой
vi: Mức độ nén: Cực chắc; Chắc; Nhẹ; Vừa phải; Khác
pt-PT: Nível de compressão: Extra firme; Firme; Ligeira; Moderado; Outro
nb: Kompresjonsnivå: Ekstra fast; Fast; Lett; Moderat; Annet
hr-HR: Razina kompresije: Ekstra čvrsto; Čvrsto; Lagano; Umjereno; Ostalo
tr: Sıkıştırma Seviyesi: Ekstra sert; Katı; Hafif; Ortalama; Diğer
zh-TW: 壓縮等級: 額外結實; 結實; 輕型; 中; 其他
de: Kompressionsstufe: Extra fest; Kräftig; Leicht; Mäßig; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Suspaudimo lygis: Ypač tvirtas; Tvirtas; Lengvas; Vidutinis; Kita
hu: Tömörítés szintje: Nagyon erős; Erős; Enyhe; Mérsékelt; Egyéb
es: Nivel de compresión: Extrafirme; Firme; Ligero; Moderado; Otros
fr: Niveau de compression: Extra ferme; Ferme; Léger; Modéré; Autre
el: Επίπεδο συμπίεσης: Ιδιαίτερα έντονη; Έντονη; Ελαφριά; Μέτρια; Άλλο
cs: Kompresní třída: Extra pevné; Pevná; Lehká; Průměrný; Jiné
nl: Compressieniveau: Extra hard; Stevig; Licht; Gemiddeld; Andere
sv: Komprimeringsnivå: Extra fast; Fast; Lätt; Måttlig; Övrigt
sl-SI: Stopnja kompresije: Ekstra čvrsta; Čvrsta; Rahla; Zmerna; Drugo
it: Livello di compressione: Extra compatto; Compatto; Leggero; Moderato; Altro
da: Kompressionsniveau: Ekstra fast; Fast; Let; Moderat; Andet
fi: Puristustaso: Erittäin kiinteä; Kiinteä; Kevyt; Kohtalainen; Muu
en: Compression level: Extra firm; Firm; Light; Moderate; Other
bg-BG: Ниво на компресиране: Изключително висока; Висока; Лека; Умерена; Други
ko: 압축 수준: 매우 단단함; 단단함; 가벼움; 보통; 기타
sk-SK: Úroveň kompresie: Extra pevný; Pevný; Svetlý; Mierny; Iné
ja: 圧縮レベル: 超硬め; 硬め; 軽い; 中程度; その他
zh-CN: 压缩级别: 特硬; 结实; 轻; 中速; 其他
ro-RO: Nivel compresie: Extra fermă; Fermă; Ușoară; Moderată; Altele
th: ระดับการบีบอัด: แน่นมาก; แน่น; ตึงเล็กน้อย; ปานกลาง; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Nível de compressão: Extra firme; Firme; Leve; Moderado; Outro
pl: Poziom kompresji: Bardzo sztywny; Stałe; Lekki; Umiarkowany; Inne